Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 31 Safety Responsibility Administration —
Security Following Accident

31-31-1.
Administration — Rules and regulations.

The division of motor vehicles shall administer and enforce the provisions of chapters 31 — 33 of this title, may make rules and regulations necessary for their administration, and shall provide for hearings upon request of persons aggrieved by orders or acts of the division of motor vehicles under the provisions of the aforementioned chapters. The division of motor vehicles shall prescribe and provide suitable forms requisite or deemed necessary for the purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 4, § 2.

31-31-2.
Appeals from division of motor vehicles.

Any person aggrieved by any decision, or order, of the division of motor vehicles, made pursuant to the provisions of chapters 31 — 33 of this title may appeal it to the traffic tribunal by filing, within ten (10) days from the date of the notice to the person of the issuance of the decision, or order, appealed from, a petition in that court stating the ground upon which the appeal is taken. Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall give thirty (30) days’ notice of the pendency of it to the division of motor vehicles by serving the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, in the manner in which subpoenas in equity are served, with a certified copy of the petition and the petition shall follow the course of equity so far as is applicable. Upon hearing the petition the court may review the evidence taken at a hearing, or investigator’s reports, or other information upon which the division’s action was taken and may, in its discretion, affirm or reverse or modify the decision or order, of the division of motor vehicles in whole or in part. The court shall determine whether the filing of the petition shall operate as a stay of the order or act of the administrator of the division of motor vehicles. A party aggrieved by a final order of the court may seek appellate review of it pursuant to the procedures set forth in §

31-41.1-8

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 4, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 142, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 332, § 1.

31-31-3.
Abstracts of operating records.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall upon request furnish any insurance carrier or any person or surety a certified abstract of the operating record of any person subject to the provisions of chapters 31 — 33 of this title. This abstract shall fully designate the motor vehicles, if any, registered in the name of the person, shall include enumeration of any motor vehicle accidents in which the person has been involved and reference to any convictions of the persons for violation of the motor vehicle laws as reported to the division of motor vehicles, and if there is no record of any conviction of the person of a violation of any provision of any statute relating to the operation of a motor vehicle or of any injury or damage caused by the person as provided in this chapter, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall so certify. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall collect for each certification the sum of ten dollars ($10.00). The requirements of this section that the certificate be furnished shall not make the certificate admissible as evidence in any legal proceeding.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 4, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 142, § 1.

31-31-4.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 4, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 142, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 398, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 399, § 1, effective July 14, 2021.

31-31-5.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 4, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 398, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 399, § 1, effective July 14, 2021.

31-31-6.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 4, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 398, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 399, § 1, effective July 14, 2021.

31-31-7.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 4, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 398, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 399, § 1, effective July 14, 2021.

31-31-8.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 4, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 398, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 399, § 1, effective July 14, 2021.

31-31-9.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 4, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 398, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 399, § 1, effective July 14, 2021.

31-31-10.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 4, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 398, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 399, § 1, effective July 14, 2021.

31-31-11.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 4, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 398, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 399, § 1, effective July 14, 2021.

31-31-12.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 4, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 398, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 399, § 1, effective July 14, 2021.

31-31-13.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 4, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 398, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 399, § 1, effective July 14, 2021.

31-31-14.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 4, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 398, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 399, § 1, effective July 14, 2021.

31-31-15.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 4, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 398, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 399, § 1, effective July 14, 2021.

31-31-16.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 4, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 398, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 399, § 1, effective July 14, 2021.

31-31-17.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 4, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 398, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 399, § 1, effective July 14, 2021.

31-31-18.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 4, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 398, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 399, § 1, effective July 14, 2021.

31-31-19.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 4, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 398, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 399, § 1, effective July 14, 2021.

31-31-20.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 4, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 398, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 399, § 1, effective July 14, 2021.

31-31-21.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 4, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 398, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 399, § 1, effective July 14, 2021.

31-31-22.
Matters not to be evidenced in civil suits.

The report required following an accident and the action taken by the division of motor vehicles upon which the action is based shall not be referred to in any way, and shall not be any evidence of the negligence or due care of either party, at the trial of any action at law to recover damages; provided, that the reports and the division action findings shall be admissible in any civil action based upon the uninsured motorist provision of an automobile insurance policy as evidence in proof of the existence of an uninsured motorist.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 4, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 398, § 4, effective July 14, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 399, § 4, effective July 14, 2021.